Utah statutes.
63G-6-207.   Specific statutory authority.

(1)  The authority to procure certain supplies, services, and construction given the public procurement units governed by the following provisions shall be retained:

(a)  Title 53B, State System of Higher Education;

(b)  Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management;

(c)  Title 67, Chapter 5, Attorney General;

(d)  Title 72, Transportation; and

(e)  Title 78A, Chapter 5, District Courts.

(2)  This authority extends only to supplies, services, and construction to the extent provided in the cited chapters.  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 63G-6-104 and 63G-6-105, the respective purchasing agencies shall procure supplies, services, and construction in accordance with this chapter.

(3) (a)  The Department of Transportation may make rules governing the procurement of highway construction or improvement.

(b)  This Subsection (3) supersedes Subsections (1) and (2).

(4)  The Legislature may procure supplies and services for its own needs.

